Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3102
Act; purpose; applicability.

The purpose of the Structured Settlements Transfers Protection Act is to protect structured settlement recipients involved in the process of transferring structured settlement payment rights. The act does not apply to structured settlements of claims for workers' compensation benefits.

Laws 2001, LB 55, § 2.